Missouri, session 2026, HB3358.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 442.021, to read as follows:
442.021. 1. As used in this section, "person" means any individual, corporation,
association, partnership, or other entity.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law, if an individual sells his or her property
to a person and there is a prescriptive easement for public use on the property being
sold, such easement shall not automatically transfer with the property binding the
person purchasing the property. However, a prescriptive easement for public use may
be reestablished on the property purchased as provided under subsection 3 of this
section.
3. A prescriptive easement for public use may be reestablished for property
purchased as provided under subsection 2 of this section if it can be demonstrated that
public use of the property was continuous, uninterrupted, visible, and adverse for a
period of ten years.
4. The ten-year period for reestablishment shall restart with each person who
purchases the property, and the person may prevent the reestablishment through oral
statements or through signage.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.